Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2180] ‘Ulu‘ulu: The
Henry K‘ualoha Giugni Moving Image Archive of Hawai‘i special
fund. There is established the ‘Ulu‘ulu: The Henry Ku‘ualoha Giugni
Moving Image Archive of Hawai‘i special fund into which shall be deposited any
legislative appropriations, federal or private grants, and any other funds
collected for the purposes of the ‘Ulu‘ulu: The Henry Ku‘ualoha Giugni Moving
Image Archive of Hawai‘i designated under section 304A-1864. The fund shall be
administered and expended by the University of Hawaii. Moneys in the fund
shall be expended to support the activities of the moving image archive. [L
2012, c 90, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next